District of Columbia statutes.
47-463

Tax Revision Commission — Composition; selection of Director.

(a)

The Commission shall be a nonpartisan body composed of 11 members, including a Chairperson.

(b)

The members of the Commission shall be appointed as follows:

(1)

The Mayor shall appoint 5 members, of whom:

(A)

Three shall be experts in the field of taxation, such as tax lawyers or public finance economists;

(B)

One shall be a community representative, such as a leader of a public-interest group, labor union, civic association, or a tenant or housing association; and

(C)

One shall be a representative of one or more important sectors of the business community, such as real estate, banking, retail, or high technology.

(2)

The Chairman of the Council shall appoint 5 members, of whom:

(A)

Three shall be experts in the field of taxation, such as tax lawyers or public finance economists;

(B)

One shall be a community representative, such as a leader of a public-interest group, labor union, civic association, or a tenant or housing association; and

(C)

One shall be a representative of one or more important sectors of the business community, such as real estate, banking, retail, or high technology.

(3)

The Chief Financial Officer, or his or her designee, shall be an ex officio member of the Commission.

(4)

The Chairman of the Council shall appoint one member of the Commission as the Chairperson of the Commission.

(c)

All appointments shall be made within 60 days of [September 14, 2011]. A vacancy shall be filled in the same manner in which the initial appointment was made.

(d)

The Commission, by a majority vote, shall select a Director who shall perform the duties required for the day-to-day functioning of the Commission as considered necessary by the members, including appointment of staff, selection of consultants, and the administration of meetings and report production.

(e)

Each member of the Commission shall serve without compensation. Each member may be reimbursed for actual expenses pursuant to § 1-611.08.

(f)

Members of the Commission shall act with the utmost integrity and professionalism. Each member shall avoid conflicts of interest and may seek the advice of the Office of the Attorney General to ensure that his or her duties are being discharged ethically.

History

June 13, 1996, D.C. Law 11-143, § 4, 43 DCR 2170
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
Sept. 14, 2011, D.C. Law 19-21, § 7062(c), 58 DCR 6226
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-171, § 114(p), 59 DCR 6190

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-463.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 19-21 rewrote the section, which formerly read:
“(a) The Commission shall be a nonpartisan Commission composed of 17 members drawn from experts in the field of taxation such as tax lawyers and public finance economists; several community representatives such as members of labor unions, public interest groups, civic associations, and tenant and housing associations; and representatives of important sectors of the business community such as real estate, banking, retailing, and public utilities.
“(b) Eight members of the Commission shall be appointed by the Mayor, and 9 members shall be appointed by the Council. The Council shall appoint the Chairperson of the Commission from among the Council-appointed members of the Commission. All appointments shall be made within 60 days of June 13, 1996. A vacancy shall be filled in the same manner in which its initial appointment was made.
“(c) The Commission, by a vote in which a majority of the members are in the affirmative, may select a Director who shall perform the duties required for the day-to-day functioning of the Commission as deemed necessary by the members, including, but not limited to, appointment of staff and selection of consultants.
“(d) The Commission may appoint task forces composed of representatives from the District of Columbia, the State of Maryland, and the Commonwealth of Virginia.
“(e) Each member of the Commission shall serve without compensation. Each member, however, may be reimbursed for actual expenses pursuant to section 1108 of the District of Columbia Government Comprehensive Merit Personnel Act of 1978, effective March 3, 1979 (§ 1-611.08).”
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-171 substituted “§ 1-611.08” for “section 1108 of the District of Columbia Government Comprehensive Merit Personnel Act of 1978, effective March 3, 2979 (§ 1-611.08)” in (e).